Washington statutes.
RCW 19.105.310

Unlawful to offer or sell contract unless contract registered—Exemptions.

Except in transactions exempt under RCW 19.105.325, it is unlawful for any person to market, offer, or sell a camping resort contract in this state or to a Washington state resident unless the camping resort contract is registered and the operator or registrant has received a permit to market the registered contracts under this chapter.

[ 2005 c 112 s 1; 1988 c 159 s 2; 1982 c 69 s 2.]